ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 94 Y 26
SFX 94 0 a .
SFX 94 0 e .
SFX 94 0 ego .
SFX 94 0 ej .
SFX 94 0 eje .
SFX 94 0 eju .
SFX 94 0 em .
SFX 94 0 emu .
SFX 94 0 mej .
SFX 94 0 my .
SFX 94 0 tej .
SFX 94 0 u .
SFX 94 0 y .
SFX 94 0 ych .
SFX 94 0 yjo .
SFX 94 0 yjom .
SFX 94 0 yjomej .
SFX 94 0 yjomy .
SFX 94 0 yjotej .
SFX 94 0 yjośo .
SFX 94 0 yjoš .
SFX 94 0 yju .
SFX 94 0 ym .
SFX 94 0 yma .
SFX 94 0 ymi .
SFX 94 0 ćo .
SFX 95 Y 24
SFX 95 0 a .
SFX 95 0 ach .
SFX 95 0 am .
SFX 95 0 ami .
SFX 95 0 e .
SFX 95 0 eju .
SFX 95 0 i .
SFX 95 0 ijo .
SFX 95 0 ijom .
SFX 95 0 ijomej .
SFX 95 0 ijomy .
SFX 95 0 ijotej .
SFX 95 0 ijośo .
SFX 95 0 ijoš .
SFX 95 0 iju .
SFX 95 0 im .
SFX 95 0 mej .
SFX 95 0 my .
SFX 95 0 oma .
SFX 95 0 ow .
SFX 95 0 owu .
SFX 95 0 tej .
SFX 95 0 u .
SFX 95 0 ćo .
SFX 96 Y 22
SFX 96 0 a .
SFX 96 0 ach .
SFX 96 0 am .
SFX 96 0 ami .
SFX 96 0 e .
SFX 96 0 ej .
SFX 96 0 eje .
SFX 96 0 eju .
SFX 96 0 en .
SFX 96 0 o .
SFX 96 0 ogo .
SFX 96 0 om .
SFX 96 0 oma .
SFX 96 0 omu .
SFX 96 0 ow .
SFX 96 0 owu .
SFX 96 0 u .
SFX 96 0 y .
SFX 96 0 ych .
SFX 96 0 ym .
SFX 96 0 yma .
SFX 96 0 ymi .
SFX 97 Y 19
SFX 97 0 ech .
SFX 97 0 echmej .
SFX 97 0 echmy .
SFX 97 0 echu .
SFX 97 0 ešo .
SFX 97 0 eštej .
SFX 97 0 ešćo .
SFX 97 0 mej .
SFX 97 0 my .
SFX 97 0 o .
SFX 97 0 om .
SFX 97 0 omej .
SFX 97 0 omy .
SFX 97 0 otej .
SFX 97 0 ośo .
SFX 97 0 oš .
SFX 97 0 tej .
SFX 97 0 u .
SFX 97 0 śo .
SFX 98 Y 20
SFX 98 0 e .
SFX 98 0 ech .
SFX 98 0 echmej .
SFX 98 0 echmy .
SFX 98 0 echu .
SFX 98 0 ešo .
SFX 98 0 eštej .
SFX 98 0 ešćo .
SFX 98 0 mej .
SFX 98 0 my .
SFX 98 0 o .
SFX 98 0 om .
SFX 98 0 omej .
SFX 98 0 omy .
SFX 98 0 otej .
SFX 98 0 ośo .
SFX 98 0 oš .
SFX 98 0 tej .
SFX 98 0 u .
SFX 98 0 ćo .
SFX 99 Y 19
SFX 99 0 e .
SFX 99 0 ech .
SFX 99 0 echmej .
SFX 99 0 echmy .
SFX 99 0 echu .
SFX 99 0 ešo .
SFX 99 0 eštej .
SFX 99 0 ešćo .
SFX 99 0 mej .
SFX 99 0 my .
SFX 99 0 o .
SFX 99 0 om .
SFX 99 0 omej .
SFX 99 0 omy .
SFX 99 0 otej .
SFX 99 0 ośo .
SFX 99 0 oš .
SFX 99 0 tej .
SFX 99 0 ćo .
SFX 100 Y 19
SFX 100 0 ech .
SFX 100 0 echmej .
SFX 100 0 echmy .
SFX 100 0 echu .
SFX 100 0 ešo .
SFX 100 0 eštej .
SFX 100 0 ešćo .
SFX 100 0 mej .
SFX 100 0 my .
SFX 100 0 o .
SFX 100 0 om .
SFX 100 0 omej .
SFX 100 0 omy .
SFX 100 0 otej .
SFX 100 0 ośo .
SFX 100 0 oš .
SFX 100 0 tej .
SFX 100 0 u .
SFX 100 0 ćo .
SFX 101 Y 18
SFX 101 0 ech .
SFX 101 0 echmej .
SFX 101 0 echmy .
SFX 101 0 echu .
SFX 101 0 ešo .
SFX 101 0 eštej .
SFX 101 0 ešćo .
SFX 101 0 mej .
SFX 101 0 my .
SFX 101 0 o .
SFX 101 0 om .
SFX 101 0 omej .
SFX 101 0 omy .
SFX 101 0 otej .
SFX 101 0 ośo .
SFX 101 0 oš .
SFX 101 0 tej .
SFX 101 0 ćo .
SFX 102 Y 11
SFX 102 0 ch .
SFX 102 0 chmej .
SFX 102 0 chmy .
SFX 102 0 chu .
SFX 102 0 j .
SFX 102 0 jmej .
SFX 102 0 jmy .
SFX 102 0 jtej .
SFX 102 0 jśo .
SFX 102 0 štej .
SFX 102 0 šćo .
SFX 103 Y 12
SFX 103 0 ch .
SFX 103 0 chmej .
SFX 103 0 chmy .
SFX 103 0 chu .
SFX 103 0 j .
SFX 103 0 jmej .
SFX 103 0 jmy .
SFX 103 0 jtej .
SFX 103 0 jśo .
SFX 103 0 šo .
SFX 103 0 štej .
SFX 103 0 šćo .
SFX 104 Y 12
SFX 104 0 ch .
SFX 104 0 chmej .
SFX 104 0 chmy .
SFX 104 0 chu .
SFX 104 0 j .
SFX 104 0 jmej .
SFX 104 0 jmy .
SFX 104 0 jtej .
SFX 104 0 jśo .
SFX 104 0 šo .
SFX 104 0 štej .
SFX 104 0 šćo .
SFX 105 Y 4
SFX 105 0 a .
SFX 105 0 ach .
SFX 105 0 am .
SFX 105 0 ami .
SFX 106 Y 4
SFX 106 0 ach .
SFX 106 0 am .
SFX 106 0 ami .
SFX 106 0 e .
SFX 107 Y 4
SFX 107 0 ach .
SFX 107 0 am .
SFX 107 0 ami .
SFX 107 0 i .
SFX 108 Y 4
SFX 108 0 ach .
SFX 108 0 am .
SFX 108 0 ami .
SFX 108 0 y .
SFX 109 Y 5
SFX 109 0 ach .
SFX 109 0 am .
SFX 109 0 ami .
SFX 109 0 e .
SFX 109 0 y .
SFX 110 Y 4
SFX 110 0 ach .
SFX 110 0 am .
SFX 110 0 ami .
SFX 110 0 ow .
SFX 111 Y 4
SFX 111 0 ach .
SFX 111 0 am .
SFX 111 0 ami .
SFX 111 0 ow .
SFX 112 Y 5
SFX 112 0 a .
SFX 112 0 ach .
SFX 112 0 am .
SFX 112 0 ami .
SFX 112 0 ow .
SFX 113 Y 5
SFX 113 0 a .
SFX 113 0 ach .
SFX 113 0 am .
SFX 113 0 ami .
SFX 113 0 ow .
SFX 114 Y 5
SFX 114 0 ach .
SFX 114 0 am .
SFX 114 0 ami .
SFX 114 0 e .
SFX 114 0 ow .
SFX 115 Y 5
SFX 115 0 ach .
SFX 115 0 am .
SFX 115 0 ami .
SFX 115 0 e .
SFX 115 0 ow .
SFX 116 Y 5
SFX 116 0 ach .
SFX 116 0 am .
SFX 116 0 ami .
SFX 116 0 i .
SFX 116 0 ow .
SFX 117 Y 5
SFX 117 0 ach .
SFX 117 0 am .
SFX 117 0 ami .
SFX 117 0 ow .
SFX 117 0 y .
SFX 118 Y 5
SFX 118 0 ach .
SFX 118 0 am .
SFX 118 0 ami .
SFX 118 0 ow .
SFX 118 0 y .
SFX 119 Y 6
SFX 119 0 a .
SFX 119 0 ach .
SFX 119 0 am .
SFX 119 0 ami .
SFX 119 0 i .
SFX 119 0 ow .
SFX 120 Y 6
SFX 120 0 a .
SFX 120 0 ach .
SFX 120 0 am .
SFX 120 0 ami .
SFX 120 0 i .
SFX 120 0 ow .
SFX 121 Y 6
SFX 121 0 ach .
SFX 121 0 am .
SFX 121 0 ami .
SFX 121 0 e .
SFX 121 0 i .
SFX 121 0 ow .
SFX 122 Y 5
SFX 122 0 ach .
SFX 122 0 am .
SFX 122 0 ami .
SFX 122 0 ow .
SFX 122 0 ě .
SFX 123 Y 19
SFX 123 0 ach .
SFX 123 0 achmej .
SFX 123 0 achmy .
SFX 123 0 achu .
SFX 123 0 ašo .
SFX 123 0 aštej .
SFX 123 0 ašćo .
SFX 123 0 e .
SFX 123 0 mej .
SFX 123 0 my .
SFX 123 0 tej .
SFX 123 0 y .
SFX 123 0 ym .
SFX 123 0 ymej .
SFX 123 0 ymy .
SFX 123 0 ytej .
SFX 123 0 yśo .
SFX 123 0 yš .
SFX 123 0 ćo .
SFX 124 Y 3
SFX 124 0 ej .
SFX 124 0 eje .
SFX 124 0 eju .
SFX 125 Y 4
SFX 125 0 ej .
SFX 125 0 eje .
SFX 125 0 eju .
SFX 125 0 i .
SFX 126 Y 4
SFX 126 0 a .
SFX 126 0 ego .
SFX 126 0 em .
SFX 126 0 emu .
SFX 127 Y 4
SFX 127 0 e .
SFX 127 0 ego .
SFX 127 0 em .
SFX 127 0 emu .
SFX 128 Y 6
SFX 128 0 a .
SFX 128 0 e .
SFX 128 0 ej .
SFX 128 0 eje .
SFX 128 0 eju .
SFX 128 0 u .
SFX 129 Y 38
SFX 129 0 a .
SFX 129 0 ach .
SFX 129 0 am .
SFX 129 0 ami .
SFX 129 0 e .
SFX 129 0 ech .
SFX 129 0 echmej .
SFX 129 0 echmy .
SFX 129 0 echu .
SFX 129 0 ego .
SFX 129 0 ej .
SFX 129 0 eje .
SFX 129 0 eju .
SFX 129 0 em .
SFX 129 0 emu .
SFX 129 0 ešo .
SFX 129 0 eštej .
SFX 129 0 ešćo .
SFX 129 0 i .
SFX 129 0 ich .
SFX 129 0 im .
SFX 129 0 ima .
SFX 129 0 imi .
SFX 129 0 mej .
SFX 129 0 my .
SFX 129 0 o .
SFX 129 0 om .
SFX 129 0 oma .
SFX 129 0 omej .
SFX 129 0 omy .
SFX 129 0 otej .
SFX 129 0 ow .
SFX 129 0 owu .
SFX 129 0 ośo .
SFX 129 0 oš .
SFX 129 0 tej .
SFX 129 0 u .
SFX 129 0 ćo .
SFX 130 Y 22
SFX 130 0 a .
SFX 130 0 ach .
SFX 130 0 am .
SFX 130 0 ami .
SFX 130 0 e .
SFX 130 0 ego .
SFX 130 0 ej .
SFX 130 0 eje .
SFX 130 0 eju .
SFX 130 0 em .
SFX 130 0 emu .
SFX 130 0 i .
SFX 130 0 ich .
SFX 130 0 im .
SFX 130 0 ima .
SFX 130 0 imi .
SFX 130 0 oju .
SFX 130 0 om .
SFX 130 0 oma .
SFX 130 0 ow .
SFX 130 0 owu .
SFX 130 0 u .
SFX 131 Y 23
SFX 131 0 a .
SFX 131 0 ach .
SFX 131 0 am .
SFX 131 0 ami .
SFX 131 0 e .
SFX 131 0 ego .
SFX 131 0 ej .
SFX 131 0 eje .
SFX 131 0 eju .
SFX 131 0 em .
SFX 131 0 emu .
SFX 131 0 i .
SFX 131 0 ich .
SFX 131 0 im .
SFX 131 0 ima .
SFX 131 0 imi .
SFX 131 0 o .
SFX 131 0 oju .
SFX 131 0 om .
SFX 131 0 oma .
SFX 131 0 ow .
SFX 131 0 owu .
SFX 131 0 u .
SFX 132 Y 23
SFX 132 0 a .
SFX 132 0 ach .
SFX 132 0 am .
SFX 132 0 ami .
SFX 132 0 e .
SFX 132 0 ego .
SFX 132 0 ej .
SFX 132 0 eje .
SFX 132 0 eju .
SFX 132 0 em .
SFX 132 0 emu .
SFX 132 0 i .
SFX 132 0 ich .
SFX 132 0 im .
SFX 132 0 ima .
SFX 132 0 imi .
SFX 132 0 o .
SFX 132 0 oju .
SFX 132 0 om .
SFX 132 0 oma .
SFX 132 0 ow .
SFX 132 0 owu .
SFX 132 0 u .
SFX 133 Y 10
SFX 133 0 i .
SFX 133 0 im .
SFX 133 0 yjo .
SFX 133 0 yjom .
SFX 133 0 yjomej .
SFX 133 0 yjomy .
SFX 133 0 yjotej .
SFX 133 0 yjośo .
SFX 133 0 yjoš .
SFX 133 0 yju .
SFX 134 Y 4
SFX 134 0 i .
SFX 134 0 ich .
SFX 134 0 im .
SFX 134 0 imi .
SFX 135 Y 23
SFX 135 0 ach .
SFX 135 0 am .
SFX 135 0 ami .
SFX 135 0 e .
SFX 135 0 ech .
SFX 135 0 echmej .
SFX 135 0 echmy .
SFX 135 0 echu .
SFX 135 0 eštej .
SFX 135 0 ešćo .
SFX 135 0 i .
SFX 135 0 mej .
SFX 135 0 my .
SFX 135 0 o .
SFX 135 0 om .
SFX 135 0 omej .
SFX 135 0 omy .
SFX 135 0 otej .
SFX 135 0 ow .
SFX 135 0 ośo .
SFX 135 0 oš .
SFX 135 0 tej .
SFX 135 0 ćo .
