ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Ardenn/117
Beskid/117
Biskupic/109
Bólašojc/106
Bóžemysl/1,121
Błot/112
Celimojc/106
Cerwj/1,128
Chus/1,124
Chójan/108
Chóžyšć/1,119
Dobrj/1,128
Dołg/107
Drježdźan/108
Drobkow/108
Dulojc/106
Fidźikup/1,118
Filipin/117
Gar/108
Garj/1,124
Gort/108
Górn/1,125
HI-wir/1,118
Harnišojc/106
Hermanec/108
Huglin/1,118
Hukl/1,124
Hórnikec/108
Jamnic/106
Jat/108
Jězykojc/106
Kamjenk/1,116
Karpat/117
Klěśišć/105
Kobł/1,124
Kortmyt/1,118
Kryngelic/106
Kózł/1,118
Kóšar/108
Kśimnic/106
Lipin/1,118
Lipj/1,127
Lěsk/131
Lěźin/108
Malediw/117
Marišojc/106
Mogilin/1,118
Moglin/1,118
Mułkec/108
Mułkojc/106
Měńkul/1,115
Młoź/1,121
Pjerkojc/114
Priz/106
Pódlěs/1,118
Rakec/109
Rjašćan/108
Rusk/1,132
Ruś/107
Seychell/1,121
Slopišć/1,119
Smólin/117
Stańšojc/106
Słopišć/1,119
Tor/1,118
Trjebul/106
Voges/114
Wilišć/1,119
Wjelimic/106
Wochoz/108
Wutwaŕk/1,116
Zasp/117
archiwalij/1,121
bluejeans/114
bluwant/117
boksershorts/110
bradł/112
bryzgel/1,121
burisk/1,132
błudnje/104
cartawk/1,116
celišć/1,119
chamornje/104
chips/1,115
chromje/1,103
chłodnje/104
comics/1,115
cor/1,126
derbizn/1,118
dewocionalij/1,121
distich/1,113
dochod/117
dojź/99
dokowa/104
dolan/108
droždźej/1,121
dwójak/130
dług/130
fekalij/1,121
fidlic/114
fidlišć/1,119
fizimatent/117
fresalij/1,121
glasejk/1,116
gluc/123
gownaśe/1,103
gołubjet/1,113
grabic/114
gójack/130
głažańc/114
głubant/1,118
indicij/1,115
insignij/1,121
jasł/1,113
jeans/114
jesć/1,119
jesćij/1,119
jutšnj/1,128
jětš/112
kaktej/1,115
kamjenk/1,116
karask/130
kaśet/1,113
kimber/117
kmótś/1,119
kniglic/114
kniglisk/120
konopj/1,115
krotc/123
kupjelišć/1,119
kwiś/129
kwiśe/1,103
kwjerlowank/1,116
kwjerlowańc/114
kónopj/1,115
kózlet/1,113
kłaź/99
kśěk/130
latifundij/1,121
leggins/114
libjet/1,113
lutk/130
luźišć/1,119
lěkot/117
lěz/100
marnje/104
mjeś/99
muce/1,103
muzikalij/1,121
mórzg/1,116
měrnje/104
měłk/130
młoźet/112
nase/102
naseś/95
nawóc/1,118
nimje/1,103
njaborjet/1,113
njas/100
njebaž/123
njebjes/105
njecarnje/1,103
njechłoźe/1,103
njedojź/99
njedokowa/104
njedłož/123
njegóruc/123
njegłodnje/1,103
njejěź/99
njeklepc/123
njekwas/123
njekłaź/101
njekšawje/1,103
njelažc/123
njelěz/100
njemjeś/101
njemócnje/1,103
njeměrnje/104
njenahanda/102
njenaseś/95
njenimc/123
njenjas/100
njenjemudrje/1,103
njepas/100
njepjac/101
njeproc/123
njeprochniwje/1,103
njepóhajka/102
njepśeměka/102
njepśeseś/95
njepśijěź/99
njepśimjen/1,133
njepśinjas/98
njepśiź/99
njepśěź/101
njepšuž/123
njerjac/99
njerozgizga/102
njesec/101
njeslěc/101
njeslěpje/1,103
njespěš/123
njesćel/97
njetłuc/101
njetśěs/100
njetšuchle/1,103
njewjeź/101
njewlac/101
njewobcerwjen/1,133
njewobraś/95
njewobrěc/123
njewobsyka/102
njewobśěžka/104
njewujź/99
njewukšocen/1,133
njewupóžywa/102
njewuseś/95
njewusłomjen/1,133
njewótkšy/102
njezase/102
njezeseś/95
njeznatšawa/102
njeśac/101
pariš/114
patok/1,116
pilet/1,113
pišćel/1,121
pjerš/123
plěsnje/1,103
podkop/117
połnje/104
prask/130
proset/112
psychofarmak/1,113
pódlejš/94
pógód/108
pómjeńš/94
pórědk/130
póspokoja/102
pówuš/94
póśiš/94
płatank/1,116
pśedcor/1,126
pśedznamjen/1,133
pśerědnjejš/94
pśeseś/95
pśetra/102
pśezwitś/1,127
pśimjen/1,133
pśinjas/98
pśiź/99
pśěź/101
racionalij/1,113
regin/117
ressourc/114
reumakupjel/1,121
rjac/99
rozkšajank/1,116
ryjnje/104
rědk/130
scarnje/102
sebjewrot/112
sec/101
sl/1,122
slěc/101
sobjet/1,113
spadank/1,116
spez/114
spiks/114
stark/130
staśiw/117
styr/1,134
surowje/104
sypadł/1,113
sćel/97
słabučk/130
słupnišć/1,119
tałuž/123
telemedij/1,121
tkalcojc/106
tonisk/1,132
triptych/1,113
trumpejtk/1,116
tut/1,96
tłuc/101
tśěs/100
tšn/1,118
tšuchle/104
warij/1,119
wir/1,118
witś/1,127
wjelžnje/1,103
wjeź/101
wlac/101
wobcerwjen/1,133
wobjěź/135
wobraś/95
wobwarjonk/1,116
woklepic/114
wopomnje/102
wrot/112
wrotk/112
wudwjern/112
wujź/99
wukšocen/1,133
wulapotk/1,116
wulk/130
wuseś/95
wust/105
wusyn/112
wusłomjen/1,133
wuśet/1,113
wódnje/104
wójack/130
wótwi/102
wóśepańc/114
wóškrabank/1,116
wěcejkost/117
wšyknyck/1,132
zeseś/95
zgibk/130
znamjen/1,133
zwótpowjesa/102
zymnje/104
Łom/1,118
śeśenjet/1,113
šerk/1,132
šesćiměst/112
špagetij/1,121
šparank/1,116
Źowkow/108
źaseśorak/130
źibaśe/104
źuŕk/112
źěs/123
źěsnick/1,113
Želnojc/106
Žlobj/1,128
žnj/1,111
žytk/1,132
